Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2088.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 503. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certificate of merit." A written declaration or certification in a medical professional liability action which includes an allegation that a health care provider deviated from an acceptable professional standard and which specifies that:(1) an appropriate licensed professional has supplied a written statement to support the declaration or certification, which clearly states that there exists a reasonable probability that the care, skill or knowledge exercised or exhibited in the treatment, practice or work that is the subject of the complaint fell outside acceptable professional standards and that the conduct was a cause in bringing about the harm;(2) the claim that the defendant deviated from an acceptable professional standard is based solely on allegations that other licensed professionals for whom this defendant is responsible deviated from an acceptable professional standard; or(3) expert testimony of an appropriate licensed professional is unnecessary for prosecution of the claim.* * *Section 2. Section 512 of the act is amended to read:Section 512. Expert qualifications.(a) General rule.--No person shall be competent to offer an expert medical opinion in a medical professional liability action against a physician, or provide a statement in support of a certificate of merit, unless that person possesses sufficient education, training, knowledge and experience to provide credible, competent testimony and fulfills the additional qualifications set forth in this section as applicable.20250HB2088PN2685 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a.1) Certificate of merit.--A certificate of merit shall be:(1) Signed by the attorney for the plaintiff or by the plaintiff if not represented by an attorney.(2) Filed in the appropriate office of the prothonotary:(i) with the complaint alleging medical professional liability or at the time of the commencement of the medical professional liability action; or(ii) within 60 days of the commencement of the medical professional liability action if the attorney for the plaintiff, or the plaintiff if not represented by an attorney, provides grounds as to why the certificate of merit was not able to be filed with the complaint or at the time of commencement of the action.(b) Medical testimony.--An expert testifying on a medical matter or providing a statement in support of a certificate of merit, including the standard of care, risks and alternatives, causation and the nature and extent of the injury, must meet the following qualifications:(1) Possess an unrestricted physician's license to practice medicine in [any state or the District of Columbia] this Commonwealth.(2) Be engaged in [or retired within the previous five years from] active clinical practice or teaching in the same or similar specialty or subspecialty of the health care provider against whom the medical professional liability action has been brought. Provided, however, the court may only waive the requirements of this subsection for an expert on a matter other than the standard of care or issuing a statement in support of a certificate of merit if the court 20250HB2088PN2685 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determines that the expert is otherwise competent to testify about medical or scientific issues by virtue of education, training or experience.(c) Standard of care.--In addition to the requirements set forth in subsections (a) and (b), an expert testifying or issuing a statement in support of a certificate of merit as to a physician's standard of care also must meet the following qualifications:(1) Be substantially familiar with the applicable standard of care for the specific care at issue as of the time of the alleged breach of the standard of care.(2) Practice in the same subspecialty as the defendant physician or in a subspecialty which has a substantially similar standard of care for the specific care at issue, except as provided in subsection (d) or (e).(3) In the event the defendant physician is certified by an approved board, be board certified by the same or a similar approved board, except as provided in subsection (e).(d) Care outside specialty.--A court may waive the same subspecialty requirement for an expert testifying on the standard of care for the diagnosis or treatment of a condition if the court determines that:(1) the expert is trained in the diagnosis or treatment of the condition, as applicable; and(2) the defendant physician provided care for that condition and such care was not within the physician's specialty or competence.(e) Otherwise adequate training, experience and knowledge.--(1) A court may waive the same specialty and board certification requirements for an expert testifying as to a 20250HB2088PN2685 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standard of care if the court determines that the expert possesses sufficient training, experience and knowledge to provide the testimony as a result of active involvement in or full-time teaching of medicine in the applicable subspecialty or a related field of medicine within the previous five-year time period.(2) The court may not waive the requirements under paragraph (1) for a person issuing a statement in support of a certificate of merit in a medical professional liability action.(f) Information to be included.--A certificate of merit and accompanying statement shall include the contact information and curriculum vitae of the medical professional issuing the statement in accordance with the requirements of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB2088PN2685 - 5 - 123456789101112131415